California, session 20252026, AB1779.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 11831.6 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:11831.6. (a) The following persons, programs, or entities shall not give or receive remuneration or anything of value for the referral or inducement of a person who is seeking alcohol or other drug recovery or treatment services:(1) An alcohol or other drug recovery or treatment facility licensed under this part.(2) An owner, partner, officer, or director, or shareholder who holds an interest of at least 10 percent in an alcohol or other drug recovery or treatment facility licensed under this part.(3) A person employed by, or working for, an alcohol or other drug recovery or treatment facility licensed under this part, including, but not limited to, registered and certified counselors and licensed professionals providing counseling services.(4) An alcohol or other drug program certified by the department in accordance with Chapter 7.1 (commencing with Section 11832).(5) An owner, partner, officer, or director, or shareholder who holds an interest of at least 10 percent in an alcohol or other drug program certified by the department in accordance with Chapter 7.1 (commencing with Section 11832).(6) A person employed by, or working for, an alcohol or other drug program certified by the department in accordance with Chapter 7.1 (commencing with Section 11832), including, but not limited to, registered and certified counselors and licensed professionals providing counseling services.(b) The practices prohibited by subdivision (a) include, but are not limited to, all of the following:(1) Influencing or inducing an individual to enter a, remain in a, or transfer between treatment or recovery programs.(2) Securing referrals.(3) Recruiting individuals for treatment.(4) Increasing insurance-funded billing or patient volume.(5) Engaging in patient brokering or similar practices.(c) This section does not apply to clinically appropriate, evidence-based therapeutic incentives, including contingency management offered to eligible Medi-Cal members as part of the Drug Medi-Cal Organized Delivery System.(d) This section does not prohibit a person, program, or entity from providing an individual with educational or informational materials about community, governmental, or nonprofit resources if no remuneration is offered in exchange for treatment enrollment or continued participation.(e) This section does not apply to the provision of housing or transportation as described in Section 11831.65.(b)(f) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may, if it deems appropriate, implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of provider bulletins, written guidelines, or similar instructions from the department, until regulations are adopted.SECTION 1.SEC. 2. Section 11831.65 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:11831.65. (a) A laboratory or certified outpatient treatment program that leases, manages, or owns housing units that are offered to individuals who concurrently utilize laboratory or outpatient services shall maintain separate contracts for the housing. The contract shall clearly state that payment for housing is the responsibility of the individual and does not depend on insurance benefits. The contract shall include a repayment plan for any subsidized rent, and the laboratory or certified outpatient treatment program shall make a good faith effort to collect the debt. The offer for housing shall not depend on the individual’s agreement to receive services from either the laboratory or the certified outpatient treatment program.(b) An alcohol or other drug recovery or treatment facility licensed under this part shall only offer an individual discounted housing following discharge from the facility if all of the following conditions are met:(1) An alcohol or other drug recovery or treatment facility and the individual enter into a written contract for housing that is separate from the contract for treatment, if the individual also pursues outpatient treatment.(2) The contract described in paragraph (1) includes a repayment plan for any subsidized rent, and the alcohol or other drug recovery or treatment facility makes a good faith effort to collect the debt.(3) The offer for housing is not dependent upon the individual’s agreement to attend outpatient treatment at a program that is owned or operated by the alcohol or other drug recovery or treatment facility.(4)The offer for housing is for housing that is certified by the state affiliate of the National Alliance for Recovery Residences.(c) A laboratory or an alcohol or other drug recovery or treatment facility licensed under this part or an alcohol or other drug recovery or treatment program certified under this part shall only offer necessary transportation services to an individual who is seeking recovery or treatment services if all of the following conditions are met:(1) The cost of the transportation needed by the individual to receive recovery or treatment services would be prohibitive for the individual without assistance from the laboratory, facility, or program.(1)(2) The assistance is not contingent upon the individual’s agreement to enroll in, remain in, or attend any particular program owned or operated by the provider.(2)(3) The assistance is limited to the actual cost of the transportation and does not include cash, a gift card, or other financial incentives.(3)(4) If ground transportation is provided, it is for a distance of less than 125 miles.(4)(5) (A) If air transportation is provided, the ticket is for round-trip transportation and includes a return ticket that may be used by the individual upon discharge.(B) A return ticket described in this paragraph that is not used by an individual upon discharge is made available to the individual upon request for a period of one year following the individual’s discharge.(5)(6) The laboratory, facility, or program obtains written acknowledgment by the individual that the assistance described in this subdivision is not tied to insurance benefits or program participation.(6)(7) The laboratory, facility, or program documents the purpose and cost of the transportation described in this subdivision.(d) The laboratory, facility, or program shall aggregate the information described in paragraph (6) (7) of subdivision (c) and shall, at least annually, publish on its internet website the aggregated information. The information posted shall not include personally identifiable information about an individual.(e) The laboratory, facility, or program shall retain the information described in paragraphs (5) and (6) (6) and (7) of subdivision (c) and the aggregated information required in subdivision (d) for a minimum of five years and shall provide the information to the department upon request.(f) This section does not prohibit a person, program, or entity from providing an individual educational or informational materials about community resources, including, but not limited to, housing assistance.SEC. 2.Section 11831.66 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:11831.66.(a)A laboratory or alcoholism or drug abuse recovery or treatment facility licensed under this part or an outpatient treatment program certified under this part shall not offer or provide any form of remuneration, including, but not limited to, a stipend or a gift card, for the purpose of any of the following:(1)Influencing or inducing an individual to enter a treatment or recovery program.(2)Influencing or inducing an individual to remain in a treatment or recovery program.(3)Influencing or inducing an individual to transfer between programs.(4)Influencing or inducing an individual to utilize laboratory or outpatient services.(5)Securing referrals.(6)Recruiting individuals for treatment.(7)Increasing insurance-funded billing or patient volume.(8)Engaging in patient brokering or similar practices.(b)This section does not prohibit a person, program, or entity from providing an individual with educational or informational materials about community, governmental, or nonprofit resources if no remuneration is offered in exchange for treatment enrollment or continued participation.(c)This section does not apply to the provision of housing or transportation as described in Section 11831.65.